Mississippi, session 2026, HB832.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-11-127, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-127.  (1)  (a)  No person who is being paid a retirement allowance or a pension after retirement under this article shall be employed or paid for any service by the State of Mississippi, including services as an employee, contract worker, contractual employee or independent contractor, until the retired person has been retired for not less than ninety (90) consecutive days from his or her effective date of retirement.  After the person has been retired for not less than ninety (90) consecutive days from his or her effective date of retirement or such later date as established by the board, he or she may be reemployed while being paid a retirement allowance under the terms and conditions provided in this section or in Section 25-11-126. (b)  No retiree of this retirement system who is reemployed or is reelected to office after retirement shall continue to draw retirement benefits while so reemployed, except as provided in this section or in Section 25-11-126. (c)  No person employed or elected under the exceptions provided for in this section shall become a member under Article 3 of the retirement system. (2)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 25-11-126, any person who has been retired under the provisions of Article 3 and who is later reemployed in service covered by this article shall cease to receive benefits under this article and shall again become a contributing member of the retirement system.  When the person retires again, if the reemployment exceeds six (6) months, the person shall have his or her benefit recomputed, including service after again becoming a member, provided that the total retirement allowance paid to the retired member in his or her previous retirement shall be deducted from the member's retirement reserve and taken into consideration in recalculating the retirement allowance under a new option selected. (3)  The board shall have the right to prescribe rules and regulations for carrying out the provisions of this section. (4)  The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit any retiree, regardless of age, from being employed and drawing a retirement allowance either: (a)  For a period of time not to exceed one-half (1/2) of the normal working days for the position in any fiscal year during which the retiree will receive no more than one-half (1/2) of the salary in effect for the position at the time of employment, or (b)  For a period of time in any fiscal year sufficient in length to permit a retiree to earn not in excess of twenty-five percent (25%) of retiree's average compensation. To determine the normal working days for a position under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the employer shall determine the required number of working days for the position on a full-time basis and the equivalent number of hours representing the full-time position.  The retiree then may work up to one-half (1/2) of the required number of working days or up to one-half (1/2) of the equivalent number of hours and receive up to one-half (1/2) of the salary for the position.  In the case of employment with multiple employers, the limitation shall equal one-half (1/2) of the number of days or hours for a single full-time position. Notice shall be given in writing to the executive director, setting forth the facts upon which the employment is being made, and the notice shall be given within five (5) days from the date of employment and also from the date of termination of the employment. (5)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section, the employer of any person who is receiving a retirement allowance and who is employed in service covered by subsection (4) of this section as an employee or a contractual employee shall pay to the board the full amount of the employer's contribution on the amount of compensation received by the retiree for his or her employment in accordance with regulations prescribed by the board.  The retiree shall not receive any additional creditable service in the retirement system as a result of the payment of the employer's contribution.  This subsection does not apply to persons who are receiving a retirement allowance and who contract with an employer to provide services as a true independent contractor, as defined by the board through regulation. (6)  (a)  A member may retire and continue in * * *municipal or county a state, district or local elective office, provided that the member has reached the age and/or service requirement that will not result in a prohibited in-service distribution as defined by the Internal Revenue Service, or a retiree may be elected to * * *a municipal or county a state, district or local office, provided that the person: (i)  Files annually, in writing, in the office of the employer and the office of the executive director of the system before the person takes office or as soon as possible after retirement, a waiver of all salary or compensation and elects to receive in lieu of that salary or compensation a retirement allowance as provided in this section, in which event no salary or compensation shall thereafter be due or payable for those services; however, any such officer * * *or employee may receive, in addition to the retirement allowance, office expense allowance, mileage or travel expense authorized by any statute of the State of Mississippi; or (ii)  Elects to receive compensation for that elective office in an amount not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the retiree's average compensation.  In order to receive compensation as allowed in this subparagraph, the retiree shall file annually, in writing, in the office of the employer and the office of the executive director of the system, an election to receive, in addition to a retirement allowance, compensation as allowed in this subparagraph. (b)  The * * *municipality or county governmental body in which the retired person holds elective office shall pay to the board the amount of the employer's contributions on the full amount of the regular compensation for the elective office that the retired person holds. (c)  As used in this subsection, the term "compensation" does not include office expense allowance, mileage or travel expense authorized by a statute of the State of Mississippi. (7)  Any retired teacher who returns to work in accordance with this section shall not be eligible to return to work under the provisions of Section 25-11-126. SECTION 2.  Section 25-11-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-105.  I.  THOSE WHO ARE ELIGIBLE FOR MEMBERSHIP The membership of this retirement system shall be composed as follows: (a)  (i)  All persons who become employees in the state service after January 31, 1953, and whose wages are subject to payroll taxes and are lawfully reported on IRS Form W-2, except those who are specifically excluded, * * *or those as to whom election is provided in Articles 1 and 3, and those persons who receive or continue to receive a retirement allowance while serving in elective office as authorized by Section 25-11-127(6), shall become members of the retirement system as a condition of their employment. (ii)  From and after July 1, 2002, any individual who is employed by a governmental entity to perform professional services shall become a member of the system if the individual is paid regular periodic compensation for those services that is subject to payroll taxes, is provided all other employee benefits and meets the membership criteria established by the regulations adopted by the board of trustees that apply to all other members of the system; however, any active member employed in such a position on July 1, 2002, will continue to be an active member for as long as they are employed in any such position. (b)  All persons who become employees in the state service after January 31, 1953, except those specifically excluded or as to whom election is provided in Articles 1 and 3, unless they file with the board before the lapse of sixty (60) days of employment or sixty (60) days after the effective date of the cited articles, whichever is later, on a form prescribed by the board, a notice of election not to be covered by the membership of the retirement system and a duly executed waiver of all present and prospective benefits that would otherwise inure to them on account of their participation in the system, shall become members of the retirement system; however, no credit for prior service will be granted to members who became members of the system before July 1, 2007, until they have contributed to Article 3 of the retirement system for a minimum period of at least four (4) years, or to members who became members of the system on or after July 1, 2007, until they have contributed to Article 3 of the retirement system for a minimum period of at least eight (8) years.  Those members shall receive credit for services performed before January 1, 1953, in employment now covered by Article 3, but no credit shall be granted for retroactive services between January 1, 1953, and the date of their entry into the retirement system, unless the employee pays into the retirement system both the employer's and the employee's contributions on wages paid him during the period from January 31, 1953, to the date of his becoming a contributing member, together with interest at the rate determined by the board of trustees.  Members reentering after withdrawal from service shall qualify for prior service under the provisions of Section 25-11-117.  From and after July 1, 1998, upon eligibility as noted above, the member may receive credit for such retroactive service provided: (i)  The member shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of trustees of certification of that service from the covered employer where the services were performed; and (ii)  The member shall pay to the retirement system on the date he or she is eligible for that credit or at any time thereafter before the date of retirement the actuarial cost for each year of that creditable service.  The provisions of this subparagraph (ii) shall be subject to the limitations of Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations promulgated under Section 415. Nothing contained in this paragraph (b) shall be construed to limit the authority of the board to allow the correction of reporting errors or omissions based on the payment of the employee and employer contributions plus applicable interest. (c)  All persons who become employees in the state service after January 31, 1953, and who are eligible for membership in any other retirement system shall become members of this retirement system as a condition of their employment, unless they elect at the time of their employment to become a member of that other system. (d)  All persons who are employees in the state service on January 31, 1953, and who are members of any nonfunded retirement system operated by the State of Mississippi, or any of its departments or agencies, shall become members of this system with prior service credit unless, before February 1, 1953, they file a written notice with the board of trustees that they do not elect to become members. (e)  All persons who are employees in the state service on January 31, 1953, and who under existing laws are members of any fund operated for the retirement of employees by the State of Mississippi, or any of its departments or agencies, shall not be entitled to membership in this retirement system unless, before February 1, 1953, any such person indicates by a notice filed with the board, on a form prescribed by the board, his individual election and choice to participate in this system, but no such person shall receive prior service credit unless he becomes a member on or before February 1, 1953. (f)  Each political subdivision of the state and each instrumentality of the state or a political subdivision, or both, is authorized to submit, for approval by the board of trustees, a plan for extending the benefits of this article to employees of any such political subdivision or instrumentality.  Each such plan or any amendment to the plan for extending benefits thereof shall be approved by the board of trustees if it finds that the plan, or the plan as amended, is in conformity with such requirements as are provided in Articles 1 and 3; however, upon approval of the plan or any such plan previously approved by the board of trustees, the approved plan shall not be subject to cancellation or termination by the political subdivision or instrumentality.  No such plan shall be approved unless: (i)  It provides that all services that constitute employment as defined in Section 25-11-5 and are performed in the employ of the political subdivision or instrumentality, by any employees thereof, shall be covered by the plan, with the exception of municipal employees who are already covered by existing retirement plans; however, those employees in this class may elect to come under the provisions of this article; (ii)  It specifies the source or sources from which the funds necessary to make the payments required by paragraph (d) of Section 25-11-123 and of paragraph (f)(v)2 and 3 of this section are expected to be derived and contains reasonable assurance that those sources will be adequate for that purpose; (iii)  It provides for such methods of administration of the plan by the political subdivision or instrumentality as are found by the board of trustees to be necessary for the proper and efficient administration thereof; (iv)  It provides that the political subdivision or instrumentality will make such reports, in such form and containing such information, as the board of trustees may from time to time require; (v)  It authorizes the board of trustees to terminate the plan in its entirety in the discretion of the board if it finds that there has been a failure to comply substantially with any provision contained in the plan, the termination to take effect at the expiration of such notice and on such conditions as may be provided by regulations of the board and as may be consistent with applicable federal law. 1.  The board of trustees shall not finally refuse to approve a plan submitted under paragraph (f), and shall not terminate an approved plan without reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing to each political subdivision or instrumentality affected by the board's decision.  The board's decision in any such case shall be final, conclusive and binding unless an appeal is taken by the political subdivision or instrumentality aggrieved by the decision to the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in accordance with the provisions of law with respect to civil causes by certiorari. 2.  Each political subdivision or instrumentality as to which a plan has been approved under this section shall pay into the contribution fund, with respect to wages (as defined in Section 25-11-5), at such time or times as the board of trustees may by regulation prescribe, contributions in the amounts and at the rates specified in the applicable agreement entered into by the board. 3.  Every political subdivision or instrumentality required to make payments under paragraph (f)(v)2 of this section is authorized, in consideration of the employees' retention in or entry upon employment after enactment of Articles 1 and 3, to impose upon its employees, as to services that are covered by an approved plan, a contribution with respect to wages (as defined in Section 25-11-5) not exceeding the amount provided in Section 25-11-123(d) if those services constituted employment within the meaning of Articles 1 and 3, and to deduct the amount of the contribution from the wages as and when paid.  Contributions so collected shall be paid into the contribution fund as partial discharge of the liability of the political subdivisions or instrumentalities under paragraph (f)(v)2 of this section.  Failure to deduct the contribution shall not relieve the employee or employer of liability for the contribution. 4.  Any state agency, school, political subdivision, instrumentality or any employer that is required to submit contribution payments or wage reports under any section of this chapter shall be assessed interest on delinquent payments or wage reports as determined by the board of trustees in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board and delinquent payments, assessed interest and any other amount certified by the board as owed by an employer, may be recovered by action in a court of competent jurisdiction against the reporting agency liable therefor or may, upon due certification of delinquency and at the request of the board of trustees, be deducted from any other monies payable to the reporting agency by any department or agency of the state. 5.  Each political subdivision of the state and each instrumentality of the state or a political subdivision or subdivisions that submit a plan for approval of the board, as provided in this section, shall reimburse the board for coverage into the expense account, its pro rata share of the total expense of administering Articles 1 and 3 as provided by regulations of the board. (g)  The board may, in its discretion, deny the right of membership in this system to any class of employees whose compensation is only partly paid by the state or who are occupying positions on a part-time or intermittent basis.  The board may, in its discretion, make optional with employees in any such classes their individual entrance into this system. (h)  An employee whose membership in this system is contingent on his own election, and who elects not to become a member, may thereafter apply for and be admitted to membership; but no such employee shall receive prior service credit unless he becomes a member before July 1, 1953, except as provided in paragraph (b). (i)  If any member of this system changes his employment to any agency of the state having an actuarially funded retirement system, the board of trustees may authorize the transfer of the member's creditable service and of the present value of the member's employer's accumulation account and of the present value of the member's accumulated membership contributions to that other system, provided that the employee agrees to the transfer of his accumulated membership contributions and provided that the other system is authorized to receive and agrees to make the transfer. If any member of any other actuarially funded system maintained by an agency of the state changes his employment to an agency covered by this system, the board of trustees may authorize the receipt of the transfer of the member's creditable service and of the present value of the member's employer's accumulation account and of the present value of the member's accumulated membership contributions from the other system, provided that the employee agrees to the transfer of his accumulated membership contributions to this system and provided that the other system is authorized and agrees to make the transfer. (j)  Wherever state employment is referred to in this section, it includes joint employment by state and federal agencies of all kinds. (k)  Employees of a political subdivision or instrumentality who were employed by the political subdivision or instrumentality before an agreement between the entity and the Public Employees' Retirement System to extend the benefits of this article to its employees, and which agreement provides for the establishment of retroactive service credit, and who became members of the retirement system before July 1, 2007, and have remained contributors to the retirement system for four (4) years, or who became members of the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007, and have remained contributors to the retirement system for eight (8) years, may receive credit for that retroactive service with the political subdivision or instrumentality, provided that the employee and/or employer, as provided under the terms of the modification of the joinder agreement in allowing that coverage, pay into the retirement system the employer's and employee's contributions on wages paid the member during the previous employment, together with interest or actuarial cost as determined by the board covering the period from the date the service was rendered until the payment for the credit for the service was made.  Those wages shall be verified by the Social Security Administration or employer payroll records.  Effective July 1, 1998, upon eligibility as noted above, a member may receive credit for that retroactive service with the political subdivision or instrumentality provided: (i)  The member shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of trustees of certification of those services from the political subdivision or instrumentality where the services were rendered or verification by the Social Security Administration; and (ii)  The member shall pay to the retirement system on the date he or she is eligible for that credit or at any time thereafter before the date of retirement the actuarial cost for each year of that creditable service.  The provisions of this subparagraph (ii) shall be subject to the limitations of Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations promulgated under Section 415. Nothing contained in this paragraph (k) shall be construed to limit the authority of the board to allow the correction of reporting errors or omissions based on the payment of employee and employer contributions plus applicable interest.  Payment for that time shall be made beginning with the most recent service.  Upon the payment of all or part of the required contributions, plus interest or the actuarial cost as provided above, the member shall receive credit for the period of creditable service for which full payment has been made to the retirement system. (l)  Through June 30, 1998, any state service eligible for retroactive service credit, no part of which has ever been reported, and requiring the payment of employee and employer contributions plus interest, or, from and after July 1, 1998, any state service eligible for retroactive service credit, no part of which has ever been reported to the retirement system, and requiring the payment of the actuarial cost for that creditable service, may, at the member's option, be purchased in quarterly increments as provided above at the time that its purchase is otherwise allowed. (m)  All rights to purchase retroactive service credit or repay a refund as provided in Section 25-11-101 et seq. shall terminate upon retirement. II. THOSE WHO ARE NOT ELIGIBLE FOR MEMBERSHIP The following classes of employees and officers shall not become members of this retirement system, any other provisions of Articles 1 and 3 to the contrary notwithstanding: (a)  Patient or inmate help in state charitable, penal or correctional institutions; (b)  Students of any state educational institution employed by any agency of the state for temporary, part-time or intermittent work; (c)  Participants of Comprehensive Employment and Training Act of 1973 (CETA) being Public Law 93-203, who enroll on or after July l, 1979; (d)  From and after July 1, 2002, individuals who are employed by a governmental entity to perform professional service on less than a full-time basis who do not meet the criteria established in I(a)(ii) of this section. III. TERMINATION OF MEMBERSHIP Membership in this system shall cease by a member withdrawing his accumulated contributions, or by a member withdrawing from active service with a retirement allowance, or by a member's death. SECTION 3.  Section 25-11-305, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-305.  (1)  The membership of the Supplemental Legislative Retirement Plan shall be composed as follows: (a)  All members of the State Legislature who are currently serving in the capacity of an elected official of the State Legislature and the person currently serving as President of the Senate shall become members of this system on July 1, 1989, unless they file with the board within thirty (30) days after July 1, 1989, on a form prescribed by the board, a notice of election not to be covered in the membership of the Supplemental Legislative Retirement Plan and a duly executed waiver of all present and prospective benefits which would otherwise inure to them on account of their participation in the plan. (b)  All members of the State Legislature and the President of the Senate who are elected after July 1, 1989, but before March 1, 2026. (2)  Any state legislators who would have otherwise qualified for membership in the plan under subsection (1) of this section but who were excluded from membership by other provisions of this section as it read before March 26, 1991, shall become members of the plan upon March 26, 1991, and shall receive creditable service in the plan for the period from July 1, 1989, to March 26, 1991, upon payment of the proper employee and employer contributions for that period. (3)  Membership in the plan shall cease by a member withdrawing his accumulated contributions, or by a member withdrawing from active service with a retirement allowance, or by death of the member. (4)  No benefits under the plan shall accrue or otherwise be payable to any person who does not qualify for membership in the plan under subsection (1) of this section. (5)  If a member of the Supplemental Legislative Retirement Plan under this article withdrew from state service and received a refund of the amount of the accumulated contributions to the credit of the member before March 1, 2026, and the person reenters state service on or after March 1, 2026, the member shall be considered to have become a member of the Public Employees' Retirement System of Mississippi under Article 3 of this chapter on or after March 1, 2026, and may not receive creditable service for service rendered before March 1, 2026. (6)  Persons who receive or continue to receive a retirement allowance while serving as a member of the Legislature as authorized by Section 25-11-127(6) shall not be active members of the plan. SECTION 4.  Section 5-1-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 5-1-41.  * * *Beginning with the 1986 Regular Session of the Legislature of the State of Mississippi, Each Senator and Representative of the Legislature shall receive as compensation at each regular session the sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) and the mileage allowance provided by Section 25-3-41, for each mile of the distance by the most direct route usually traveled in coming to and returning from the place where the Legislature sits.  * * *Beginning on April 16, 1997, Each Senator and Representative shall receive for attending each extraordinary session or called session the sum of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) per day and mileage at the same rate as per regular session.  In addition to the above, * * *beginning on April 16, 1997, each Senator and Representative and the Lieutenant Governor shall receive the sum of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) per month for expenses incidental to his office for every full month of his term, except any month or major fraction thereof when the Legislature is convened in regular or extraordinary session; and payments shall be made to each Senator and Representative and the Lieutenant Governor by the State Treasurer between the first and tenth day of each month following the month for which the payments are due. A Senator or Representative who wishes to receive or continue to receive a retirement allowance while serving in elective office as authorized by Section 25-11-127(6) may waive all or any part of the compensation and mileage allowance provided under this section in order to comply with the limitations on compensation required by Section 25-11-127(6). SECTION 5.  Section 5-1-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 5-1-47.  (1)  In addition to the regular salary and mileage provided by law, an expense allowance equal to the maximum daily expense rate allowable to employees of the federal government for travel in the high rate geographical area of Jackson, Mississippi, as may be established by federal regulations for each legislative day in actual attendance at a session shall be paid to the Lieutenant Governor and members of the Senate and House of Representatives, together with an additional mileage allowance as provided by Section 25-3-41, for each mile of the distance by the most direct route usually traveled in coming to and returning from the place where the Legislature is in session, which expense allowance and additional mileage allowance shall be paid at the end of each seven-day period while the Legislature is in session. (2)  In addition to the mileage allowance provided for in subsection (1) of this section, an expense allowance equal to the maximum daily expense rate allowable to employees of the federal government for travel in the high rate geographical area of Jackson, Mississippi, as may be established by federal regulations, per day, shall be paid to: (a)  The Lieutenant Governor and members of the Senate, upon the approval of the Senate Rules Committee, for attending to legislative duties on any of the following days that the Senate does not convene in session on that day:  (i) any day between legislative regular or extraordinary sessions, or (ii) any day of a legislative regular session that has been extended beyond the number of calendar days specified in Section 36, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, when that day falls after the ninetieth or one-hundred-twenty-fifth day of the session, as the case may be, or (iii) any day during a legislative extraordinary session; and (b)  Members of the House of Representatives, upon the approval of the House Management Committee, for attending to legislative duties on any of the following days that the House does not convene in session on that day:  (i) any day between legislative regular or extraordinary sessions, or (ii) any day of a legislative regular session that has been extended beyond the number of calendar days specified in Section 36, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, when that day falls after the ninetieth or one-hundred-twenty-fifth day of the session, as the case may be, or (iii) any day during a legislative extraordinary session. (3)  The expense allowance and additional mileage allowance provided by this section for the Lieutenant Governor and members of the Senate shall be paid from the appropriate legislative fund of the Senate as provided by law, and the expense allowance and additional mileage allowance for members of the House of Representatives shall be paid from the appropriate legislative fund of the House of Representatives as provided by law, upon warrants drawn for such purpose in the manner provided by law. (4)  A member of the Senate or House of Representatives who wishes to receive or continue to receive a retirement allowance while serving in elective office as authorized by Section 25-11-127(6) may waive all or any part of the expense allowance and mileage allowance provided under this section in order to comply with the limitations on compensation required by Section 25-11-127(6). SECTION 6.  Section 9-9-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 9-9-11.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2), (3) and (4), the county court judge shall receive an annual salary payable monthly out of the county treasury in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than the salary which is now or shall hereafter be provided for circuit and chancery judges of this state, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of * * *said the county; * * *provided, however, * * *that the salary of such judge shall not be reduced during his term of office.  * * *Provided further, that In addition, the office of county court judge in any county receiving an annual salary of Thirty-six Thousand Dollars ($36,000.00) or more shall be a full-time position, and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law. (2)  If a county court is established by agreement between two (2) or more counties as provided in Section 9-9-3, the county judge of the court so established shall be paid a salary equal to one and one-half (1-1/2) times that salary that he would be paid if he were the judge of the smallest of such two (2) or more counties, such salary to be paid in monthly installments as provided by law; provided that such salary shall not exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than the salary of the circuit and chancery judges of this state. (3)  The county court judge shall receive an annual salary payable monthly out of the county treasury as follows: (a)  In any county having a population of seventy thousand (70,000) or more according to the 1980 federal census, the county judge shall receive an annual salary of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than that paid to a circuit court judge. The office of county judge shall be a full-time position, and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law. (b)  In any county having a population of sixty thousand (60,000) or more but less than seventy thousand (70,000) according to the 1980 federal census, the county judge shall receive an annual salary of Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00).  The office of county judge shall be a full-time position, and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law.  The county judge shall not be eligible for any additional salary except as may be authorized in subsection (4). (c)  In any county having a population of twenty-seven thousand (27,000) or more but less than sixty thousand (60,000) according to the 1980 federal census, the county judge shall receive an annual salary of not less than Twelve Thousand Dollars ($12,000.00) but not more than Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00), in the discretion of the board of supervisors of * * *said the county.  The county judge shall not be eligible for any additional salary except as may be authorized in subsection (4).  In the event that the board of supervisors of * * *said the county elects to pay such county judge an annual salary of Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00) or more, the office of county judge shall be a full-time position, and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law. (d)  In any county having a population of less than twenty-seven thousand (27,000) according to the 1980 federal census, the county judge shall receive an annual salary of not less than Four Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($4,200.00) and not more than Eight Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($8,500.00), in the discretion of the board of supervisors of * * *said the county.  The county judge shall not be eligible for any additional salary except as may be authorized in subsection (4). (4)  The county judge of any county described in this subsection shall be paid the compensation, and he shall be subject to any restrictions set forth in the following paragraphs: (a)  The county judge of any such Class 1 county with a population according to the latest federal decennial census of forty-five thousand (45,000) or more and lying wholly within a levee district and having two (2) judicial districts shall, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of such county, receive an annual salary not exceeding Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00), or a sum which is One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than the salary which is now or shall hereafter be provided for circuit and chancery judges of the state, whichever is greater. (b)  The county judge of any Class 1 county having an area in excess of nine hundred twenty-five (925) square miles shall receive an annual salary of not less than Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00) but, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of such county, such salary may be not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) less than the annual salary of a circuit judge, payable monthly out of the county treasury, and the county judge shall not practice law. (c)  The office of county judge in any such Class 1 county with a population according to the 1970 federal decennial census of greater than thirty-nine thousand (39,000), and where U.S. Highway 61 and Mississippi Highway 6 intersect, shall receive an annual salary to be paid in monthly installments of not less than an amount equal to ninety percent (90%) of the annual salary which is now or shall hereafter be provided for circuit and chancery judges of the state, as follows:  The salary of the county judge shall be increased by ten percent (10%) annually above the base salary of the preceding year until such time as the judge's salary is equal to the amount that is provided by this subsection. The office of county judge shall be a full-time position and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law. (d)  In any Class 1 county bordering on the Mississippi River and which has situated therein a national military park and national military cemetery, the office of county judge shall be a full-time position and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law.  The salary for the county judge in * * *said the county shall be fixed at a sum which is One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than the salary which is now or shall hereafter be provided for circuit and chancery judges of this state. (e)  The county judge in any county having a population of at least forty-two thousand one hundred eleven (42,111), according to the 1970 census, and where U.S. Highway 49E and U.S. Highway 82 intersect, shall receive an annual salary to be paid in monthly installments of not less than Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00) but not more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) less than the annual salary of the circuit judge, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of * * *said the county. (f)  The county judge in any Class 1 county bordering on the Mississippi River and having an area of less than four hundred fifty (450) square miles wherein U.S. Highways 84 and 61 intersect shall receive an annual salary of Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00) less than the annual salary of a circuit judge, and such county judge shall not practice law in any manner.  The county judge in such county shall not be eligible to receive any additional salary authorized by this section or from any other source other than that set out and authorized by this paragraph. (g)  The county judge of any Class 1 county bordering on the Mississippi River on the west and the State of Tennessee on the north, and traversed north to south by Interstate Highway 55, shall receive an annual salary of ninety percent (90%) of the salary which is now or shall hereafter be provided for chancery and circuit judges of this state, but in any event not less than Sixty Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($60,200.00). (h)  The county judge of any Class 1 county with a population of greater than sixty-nine thousand (69,000) according to the 1980 federal decennial census, and wherein U.S. Highway 80 and Mississippi Highway 43 intersect, shall receive an annual salary in an amount not greater than the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) less than the salary which is now or shall hereafter be provided for circuit and chancery judges of this state, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of * * *said the county. (i)  The county judge of any county having a population in excess of sixty-six thousand (66,000) according to the 1980 federal decennial census, wherein is located a state-supported university and in which U.S. Highways 49 and 11 intersect, shall receive an annual salary of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than that paid to a circuit court judge.  The office of such county judge shall be a full-time position, and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law. (j)  The county judge of any county having two (2) judicial districts, having a population in excess of sixty-one thousand nine hundred (61,900) according to the 1980 federal decennial census, in which U.S. Interstate Highway 59 intersects with U.S. Highway 84, shall receive an annual salary of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than the salary which is now or hereafter authorized to be paid circuit and chancery court judges of this state.  The office of such county judge shall be a full-time position, and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law. (k)  The office of county judge of any Class I county wherein U.S. Highway 51 and U.S. Highway 98 intersect shall be a full-time position and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law.  The annual salary for the office of county judge in * * *said the county may be fixed, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of * * *said the county, at a sum not to exceed Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) less than the salary which is now or shall hereafter be provided for circuit and chancery judges of this state. (l)  The county judge of any county having a population of more than forty-one thousand six hundred (41,600) but less than forty-one thousand six hundred fifty (41,650) according to the 1980 federal census, and wherein U.S. Highway 49 intersects with Mississippi Highway 22, shall receive an annual salary payable monthly out of the county treasury of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than the salary provided now or hereafter for circuit and chancery judges of this state. (m)  The county judge of any county having a population of more than fifty-seven thousand (57,000) but less than fifty-seven thousand one hundred (57,100) according to the 1980 federal census, wherein U.S. Highway 45 intersects with Mississippi Highway 6, shall receive an annual salary in an amount established by the board of supervisors, but in no event to exceed the salary provided now or hereafter for circuit and chancery judges of this state. (n)  The county judge of any county having a population of more than fifty-seven thousand three hundred (57,300) according to the 1980 federal decennial census, wherein is located a state-supported university and wherein U.S. Highways 82 and 45 intersect, shall receive an annual salary in an amount established by the board of supervisors, but in no event to exceed the salary provided now or hereafter for circuit and chancery judges of this state. (5)  The salary of a county court judge or justice court judge shall not be reduced during his term of office as a result of a population decrease based upon the 1990 federal decennial census. (6)  The salary of a sheriff shall not be reduced during his term of office as a result of a population decrease based upon the 1990 federal decennial census. (7)  Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the board of supervisors of any county, in its discretion, may pay its county court judge an annual salary of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than that paid to a circuit court judge. The office of county judge shall be a full-time position, and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law. (8)  (a)  There shall be transferred to the county for each county court judge, payment to be made in monthly installments from the Judicial System Operation Fund created under Section 9-21-45, an annual salary supplement of: (i)  From and after January 1, 2013, through December 31, 2013, the sum of Seven Thousand Nine Hundred Fifty-seven Dollars and Fifty Cents ($7,957.50), plus any applicable fringe benefits resulting from this amount; (ii)  From and after January 1, 2014, through December 31, 2014, the sum of Fifteen Thousand Nine Hundred Fifteen Dollars ($15,915.00), plus any applicable fringe benefits resulting from this amount; (iii)  From and after January 1, 2015, through December 31, 2015, the sum of Twenty-three Thousand Eight Hundred Seventy-two Dollars and Fifty Cents ($23,872.50), plus any applicable fringe benefits resulting from this amount; and (iv)  From and after January 1, 2016, through December 31, 2019, the sum of Thirty-one Thousand Eight Hundred Thirty Dollars ($31,830.00), plus any applicable fringe benefits resulting from this amount. (b)  From and after January 1, 2019, and every four (4) years thereafter, the annual salary in this subsection (8) shall be adjusted according to the level of compensation recommended by the State Personnel Board for county court judges in the board's most recent report on judicial salaries, as required under Section 25-9-115, to the extent that sufficient funds are available. (c)  The total annual salary paid to the county court judge out of the county treasury and out of the Judicial System Operation Fund created under Section 9-21-45 shall not exceed the salary limitation set forth in subsection (7) of this section. (9)  A county court judge who wishes to receive or continue to receive a retirement allowance while serving in elective office as authorized by Section 25-11-127(6) may waive all or any part of the compensation provided under this section in order to comply with the limitations on compensation required by Section 25-11-127(6). SECTION 7.  Section 25-3-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [ * * *From and after January 1, 2024, and Through December 31, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 25-3-3  (1)  The term "total assessed valuation" as used in this section only refers to the ad valorem assessment for the county and, in addition, in counties where oil or gas is produced, the actual value of oil at the point of production, as certified to the counties by the Department of Revenue under the provisions of Sections 27-25-501 through 27-25-525, and the actual value of gas as certified by the Department of Revenue under the provisions of Sections 27-25-701 through 27-25-723. (2)  The salary of assessors and collectors of the various counties is fixed as full compensation for their services as county assessors or tax collectors, or both if the office of assessor has been combined with the office of tax collector.  The annual salary of each assessor or tax collector, or both if the offices have been combined, shall be based upon the total assessed valuation of his respective county for the preceding taxable year in the following categories and for the following amounts: (a)  For counties having a total assessed valuation of Three Billion Dollars ($3,000,000,000.00) or more, a salary of Seventy-five Thousand Five Hundred Sixty Dollars ($75,560.00); (b)  For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least Two Billion Dollars ($2,000,000,000.00) but less than Three Billion Dollars ($3,000,000,000.00), a salary of Seventy-two Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($72,200.00); (c)  For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least One Billion Dollars ($1,000,000,000.00) but less than Two Billion Dollars ($2,000,000,000.00), a salary of Sixty-nine Thousand Five Hundred Seventy-five Dollars ($69,575.00); (d)  For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least Five Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00) but less than One Billion Dollars ($1,000,000,000.00), a salary of Sixty-six Thousand Four Hundred Twenty-five Dollars ($66,425.00); (e)  For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least Two Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($250,000,000.00) but less than Five Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00), a salary of Sixty-three Thousand Eight Hundred Dollars ($63,800.00); (f)  For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least One Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($150,000,000.00) but less than Two Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($250,000,000.00), a salary of Sixty-one Thousand Seven Hundred Dollars ($61,700.00); (g)  For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00) but less than One Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($150,000,000.00), a salary of Sixty Thousand One Hundred Twenty-five Dollars ($60,125.00); (h)  For counties having a total assessed valuation of less than Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00), a salary of Fifty-five Thousand Nine Hundred Twenty-nine Dollars ($55,929.00). (3)  In addition to all other compensation paid pursuant to this section, the board of supervisors shall pay to a person serving as both the tax assessor and tax collector in their county an additional Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per year. (4)  The annual salary established for assessors and tax collectors shall not be reduced as a result of a reduction in total assessed valuation.  The salaries shall be increased as a result of an increase in total assessed valuation. (5)  In addition to all other compensation paid to assessors and tax collectors in counties having two (2) judicial districts, the board of supervisors shall pay such assessors and tax collectors an additional Three Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($3,500.00) per year.  In addition to all other compensation paid to assessors or tax collectors, in counties maintaining two (2) full-time offices, the board of supervisors shall pay the assessor or tax collector an additional Three Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($3,500.00) per year. (6)  In addition to all other compensation paid to assessors and tax collectors, the board of supervisors of a county shall allow for such assessor or tax collector, or both, to be paid additional compensation when there is a contract between the county and one or more municipalities providing that the assessor or tax collector, or both, shall assess or collect taxes, or both, for the municipality or municipalities; and such assessor or tax collector, or both, shall be authorized to receive such additional compensation from the county and/or the municipality or municipalities in any amount allowed by the county and/or the municipality or municipalities for performing those services. (7)  When any tax assessor holds a valid certificate of educational recognition from the Mississippi Cooperative Extension Service or is a licensed appraiser under Section 73-34-1 et seq., he shall receive an additional One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) annually beginning the next fiscal year after completion.  When any tax assessor is a licensed state certified Residential Appraiser (RA) or licensed state certified Timberland Appraiser (TA) under Section 73-34-1 et seq., or when any tax assessor holds a valid designation from the International Association of Assessing Officers as a Cadastral Mapping Specialist (CMS) or Personal Property Specialist (PPS) or Residential Evaluation Specialist (RES), he shall receive an additional Six Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($6,500.00) annually beginning the next fiscal year after completion.  When any tax assessor holds the valid designation of Certified Assessment Evaluator (CAE) from the International Association of Assessing Officers or is a state certified General Real Estate Appraiser (GA) under Section 73-34-1 et seq., he shall receive an additional Eight Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($8,500.00) annually beginning the next fiscal year after completion. (8)  The salaries provided for in this section shall be the total funds paid to the county assessors and tax collectors and shall be full compensation for their services, with any fees being paid to the county general fund. (9)  The salaries provided for in this section shall be payable monthly on the first day of each calendar month by chancery clerk's warrant drawn on the general fund of the county; however, the board of supervisors, by resolution duly adopted and entered on its minutes, may provide that such salaries shall be paid semimonthly on the first and fifteenth day of each month or every two (2) weeks pursuant to Section 25-3-29. If a pay date falls on a weekend or legal holiday, salary payments shall be made on the workday immediately preceding the weekend or legal holiday. (10)  A tax assessor or tax collector who wishes to receive or continue to receive a retirement allowance while serving in elective office as authorized by Section 25-11-127(6) may waive all or any part of the compensation provided under this section in order to comply with the limitations on compensation required by Section 25-11-127(6). [From and after January 1, 2028, this section shall read as follows:] (1)  The term "total assessed valuation" as used in this section only refers to the ad valorem assessment for the county and, in addition, in counties where oil or gas is produced, the actual value of oil at the point of production, as certified to the counties by the Department of Revenue under the provisions of Sections 27-25-501 through 27-25-525, and the actual value of gas as certified by the Department of Revenue under the provisions of Sections 27-25-701 through 27-25-723. (2)  The salary of assessors and collectors of the various counties is fixed as full compensation for their services as county assessors or tax collectors, or both if the office of assessor has been combined with the office of tax collector.  The annual salary of each assessor or tax collector, or both if the offices have been combined, shall be based upon the total assessed valuation of his respective county for the preceding taxable year in the following categories and for the following amounts: (a)  For counties having a total assessed valuation of Three Billion Dollars ($3,000,000,000.00) or more, a salary of Eighty Thousand Five Hundred Sixty Dollars ($80,560.00); (b)  For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least Two Billion Dollars ($2,000,000,000.00) but less than Three Billion Dollars ($3,000,000,000.00), a salary of Seventy-seven Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($77,200.00); (c)  For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least One Billion Dollars ($1,000,000,000.00) but less than Two Billion Dollars ($2,000,000,000.00), a salary of Seventy-four Thousand Five Hundred Seventy-five Dollars ($74,575.00); (d)  For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least Five Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00) but less than One Billion Dollars ($1,000,000,000.00), a salary of Seventy-one Thousand Four Hundred Twenty-five Dollars ($71,425.00); (e)  For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least Two Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($250,000,000.00) but less than Five Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00), a salary of Sixty-eight Thousand Eight Hundred Dollars ($68,800.00); (f)  For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least One Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($150,000,000.00) but less than Two Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($250,000,000.00), a salary of Sixty-six Thousand Seven Hundred Dollars ($66,700.00); (g)  For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00) but less than One Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($150,000,000.00), a salary of Sixty-five Thousand One Hundred Twenty-five Dollars ($65,125.00); (h)  For counties having a total assessed valuation of less than Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00), a salary of Sixty Thousand Nine Hundred Twenty-nine Dollars ($60,929.00). (3)  In addition to all other compensation paid pursuant to this section, the board of supervisors shall pay to a person serving as both the tax assessor and tax collector in their county an additional Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per year. (4)  The annual salary established for assessors and tax collectors shall not be reduced as a result of a reduction in total assessed valuation.  The salaries shall be increased as a result of an increase in total assessed valuation. (5)  In addition to all other compensation paid to assessors and tax collectors in counties having two (2) judicial districts, the board of supervisors shall pay such assessors and tax collectors an additional Three Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($3,500.00) per year.  In addition to all other compensation paid to assessors or tax collectors, in counties maintaining two (2) full-time offices, the board of supervisors shall pay the assessor or tax collector an additional Three Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($3,500.00) per year. (6)  In addition to all other compensation paid to assessors and tax collectors, the board of supervisors of a county shall allow for such assessor or tax collector, or both, to be paid additional compensation when there is a contract between the county and one or more municipalities providing that the assessor or tax collector, or both, shall assess or collect taxes, or both, for the municipality or municipalities; and such assessor or tax collector, or both, shall be authorized to receive such additional compensation from the county and/or the municipality or municipalities in any amount allowed by the county and/or the municipality or municipalities for performing those services. (7)  When any tax assessor holds a valid certificate of educational recognition from the Mississippi Cooperative Extension Service or is a licensed appraiser under Section 73-34-1 et seq., he shall receive an additional One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) annually beginning the next fiscal year after completion.  When any tax assessor is a licensed state certified Residential Appraiser (RA) or licensed state certified Timberland Appraiser (TA) under Section 73-34-1 et seq., or when any tax assessor holds a valid designation from the International Association of Assessing Officers as a Cadastral Mapping Specialist (CMS) or Personal Property Specialist (PPS) or Residential Evaluation Specialist (RES), he shall receive an additional Six Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($6,500.00) annually beginning the next fiscal year after completion.  When any tax assessor holds the valid designation of Certified Assessment Evaluator (CAE) from the International Association of Assessing Officers or is a state certified General Real Estate Appraiser (GA) under Section 73-34-1 et seq., he shall receive an additional Eight Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($8,500.00) annually beginning the next fiscal year after completion. (8)  The salaries provided for in this section shall be the total funds paid to the county assessors and tax collectors and shall be full compensation for their services, with any fees being paid to the county general fund. (9)  The salaries provided for in this section shall be payable monthly on the first day of each calendar month by chancery clerk's warrant drawn on the general fund of the county; however, the board of supervisors, by resolution duly adopted and entered on its minutes, may provide that such salaries shall be paid semimonthly on the first and fifteenth day of each month or every two (2) weeks pursuant to Section 25-3-29. If a pay date falls on a weekend or legal holiday, salary payments shall be made on the workday immediately preceding the weekend or legal holiday. (10)  A tax assessor or tax collector who wishes to receive or continue to receive a retirement allowance while serving in elective office as authorized by Section 25-11-127(6) may waive all or any part of the compensation provided under this section in order to comply with the limitations on compensation required by Section 25-11-127(6). SECTION 8.  Section 25-3-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-3-25.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (3) of this section, the salaries of sheriffs of the various counties are fixed as full compensation for their services. The annual salary for each sheriff shall be based upon the total population of his county according to the latest federal decennial census in the following categories and for the following amounts; however, no sheriff shall be paid less than the salary authorized under this section to be paid the sheriff based upon the population of the county according to the most recent federal decennial census: (a)  For counties with a total population of more than one hundred thousand (100,000), a salary of One Hundred Four Thousand Dollars ($104,000.00). (b)  For counties with a total population of more than forty-four thousand (44,000) and not more than one hundred thousand (100,000), a salary of Ninety-five Thousand Dollars ($95,000.00). (c)  For counties with a total population of more than thirty thousand (30,000) and not more than forty-four thousand (44,000), a salary of Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00). (d)  For counties with a total population of more than twelve thousand five hundred (12,500) and not more than thirty thousand (30,000), a salary of Eighty-five Thousand Dollars ($85,000.00). (e)  For counties with a total population of not more than twelve thousand five hundred (12,500), a salary of Eighty Thousand Dollars ($80,000.00). (2)  In addition to the salary provided in subsection (1) of this section, the board of supervisors of any county, in its discretion, may pay an annual supplement to the sheriff of the county in an amount not to exceed Thirty-five Thousand Dollars ($35,000.00).  The amount of the supplement shall be spread on the minutes of the board. (3)  In addition to the salary provided in subsection (1) of this section and any supplements authorized in subsection (2) of this section, a sheriff may receive the premium pay provided for in Section 45-2-41 as part of the sheriff's compensation. (4)  (a)  The salaries provided in this section shall be payable monthly on the first day of each calendar month by chancery clerk's warrant drawn on the general fund of the county; however, the board of supervisors, by resolution duly adopted and entered on its minutes, may provide that such salaries shall be paid semimonthly on the first and fifteenth day of each month.  If a pay date falls on a weekend or legal holiday, salary payments shall be made on the workday immediately preceding the weekend or legal holiday. (b)  At least Ten Dollars ($10.00) from each fee collected and deposited into the county's general fund under the provisions of * * * paragraphs (a), (c) and (g) of subsection (1) of Section 25-7-19(1)(a), (c) and (g) shall be used for the sheriffs' salaries authorized in Section 25-3-25; as such ten-dollar * * * ($10.00) amount was authorized * * * during the 2007 Regular Session in Chapter 331, Laws of 2007, for the purpose of providing additional monies to the counties for sheriffs' salaries. (5)  (a)  All sheriffs, each year, shall attend twenty (20) hours of continuing education courses in law enforcement.  Such courses shall be approved by the Mississippi Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training.  Such education courses may be provided by an accredited law enforcement academy or by the Mississippi Sheriffs' Association. (b)  The Mississippi Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training shall reimburse each county for the expenses incurred by sheriffs and deputy sheriffs for attendance at any approved training programs as required by this subsection. (6)  Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, no sheriff shall receive for his services an annual salary less than the salary paid to that sheriff on July 1, 2024. (7)  A sheriff who wishes to receive or continue to receive a retirement allowance while serving in elective office as authorized by Section 25-11-127(6) may waive all or any part of the compensation provided under this section in order to comply with the limitations on compensation required by Section 25-11-127(6). SECTION 9.  Section 25-3-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-3-31.  * * *(1) The annual salaries of the following elected state and district officers are fixed as follows: Governor........................................... $ 160,000.00 Attorney General..................................... 150,000.00 Secretary of State................................... 120,000.00 Commissioner of Insurance............................ 150,000.00 State Treasurer...................................... 120,000.00 State Auditor of Public Accounts..................... 150,000.00 Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce.............. 120,000.00 Transportation Commissioners......................... 95,000.00 Public Service Commissioners......................... 95,000.00 * * *(2)  [Repealed] (2)  A state or district officer who wishes to receive or continue to receive a retirement allowance while serving in elective office as authorized by Section 25-11-127(6) may waive all or any part of the compensation provided under this section in order to comply with the limitations on compensation required by Section 25-11-127(6). SECTION 10.  Section 25-3-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-3-35.  (1)  The annual salaries of the following judges are fixed as follows: * * *     Through December 31, 2022: Chief Justice of the Supreme Court $174,000.00 Presiding Justices of the Supreme Court, each 169,500.00 Associate Justices of the Supreme Court, each 166,500.00 From and after January 1, 2023: Chief Justice of the Supreme Court............... $181,491.00 Presiding Justices of the Supreme Court, each.... 176,737.00 Associate Justices of the Supreme Court, each.... 173,800.00 * * * There are imposed upon the Supreme Court justices the extra duties of taking all necessary action to promote judicial education in schools, intervention courts, electronic filing and case management systems as developed by the Administrative Office of Courts, or such other additional duties as may be assigned by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.  For such extra services each justice, from and after January 1, 2023, shall receive a sum sufficient to aggregate, per annum, the salaries set forth in this subsection (1). The fixed salaries in this subsection (1) shall be paid from the State General Fund and from the Judicial System Operation Fund created under Section 9-21-45.  No less than:  One Hundred Fifteen Thousand Three Hundred Ninety Dollars ($115,390.00) of the Chief Justice's salary in this subsection (1), One Hundred Thirteen Thousand One Hundred Ninety Dollars ($113,190.00) of the salary of a presiding justice in this subsection (1), and One Hundred Twelve Thousand Five Hundred Thirty Dollars ($112,530.00) of the salary of an associate justice in this subsection (1) shall be paid from general fund monies; in addition, the Legislature shall appropriate annually from the Judicial System Operation Fund a sum sufficient to increase the salary of the Chief Justice, a presiding justice and an associate justice to the levels set forth in this subsection (1). The fixed salaries as specified in this subsection (1) shall be the exclusive and total compensation which can be reported to the Public Employees' Retirement System for retirement purposes; however, any judge in office on December 31, 2003, may continue to report his expense allowance as part of his compensation for retirement purposes. (2)  The annual salaries of the judges of the Court of Appeals of Mississippi are fixed as follows: * * *     Through December 31, 2022: Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals $161,500.00 Associate Judges of the Court of Appeals, each 158,500.00 From and after January 1, 2023: Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals.............. $169,349.00 Associate Judges of the Court of Appeals, each... 168,467.00 * * * From and after January 1, 2023, each judge shall receive a sum sufficient to aggregate, per annum, the salaries set forth in this subsection (2). The fixed salaries in this subsection (2) shall be paid from the State General Fund and from the Judicial System Operation Fund created under Section 9-21-45.  No less than One Hundred Eight Thousand One Hundred Thirty Dollars ($108,130.00) of the Chief Judge's salary in this subsection (2) shall be paid from general fund monies; in addition, the Legislature shall appropriate annually from the Judicial System Operation Fund a sum sufficient to increase the Chief Judge's salary to the level set forth in this subsection (2).  No less than One Hundred Five Thousand Fifty Dollars ($105,050.00) of the salary of an associate judge in this subsection (2) shall be paid from general fund monies; in addition, the Legislature shall appropriate annually from the Judicial System Operation Fund a sum sufficient to increase the salary of an associate judge to the level set forth in this subsection (2). The fixed salaries as specified in this subsection (2) shall be the exclusive and total compensation which can be reported to the Public Employees' Retirement System for retirement purposes; however, any judge in office on December 31, 2003, may continue to report his expense allowance as part of his compensation for retirement purposes. (3)  The annual salaries of the chancery and circuit court judges are fixed as follows: * * *     Through December 31, 2022: Chancery Judges, each $149,000.00 Circuit Judges, each 149,000.00 From and after January 1, 2023: Chancery Judges, each........................... $158,000.00 Circuit Judges, each............................ 158,000.00 * * * In addition to their present official duties, the circuit and chancery judges shall take necessary action to promote judicial education in schools, intervention courts, electronic filing and case management systems as developed by the Administrative Office of Courts, or such other additional duties as may be assigned by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.  For such extra services each judge, from and after January 1, 2023, shall receive a sum sufficient to aggregate, per annum, the salaries set forth in this subsection (3). The fixed salaries in this subsection (3) shall be paid from the State General Fund and from the Judicial System Operation Fund created under Section 9-21-45.  No less than One Hundred Four Thousand One Hundred Seventy Dollars ($104,170.00) of the salary of a chancery or circuit judge in this subsection (3) shall be paid from general fund monies; in addition, the Legislature shall appropriate annually from the Judicial System Operation Fund a sum sufficient to increase the salary of a chancery or circuit judge to the levels set forth in this subsection (3). (4)  From and after January 1, 2019, and every four (4) years thereafter, the annual salaries of the judges in subsections (1), (2) and (3) shall be fixed at the level of compensation recommended by the State Personnel Board according to the board's most recent report on judicial salaries, as required under Section 25-9-115, to the extent that sufficient funds are available.  The annual salaries fixed in accordance with this subsection (4) shall not become effective until the commencement of the next immediately succeeding term of office. (5)  The Supreme Court shall prepare a payroll for chancery judges and circuit judges and submit such payroll to the Department of Finance and Administration. (6)  The annual salary of the full-time district attorneys shall be * * *: From and after January 1, 2016, through December 31, 2022: One Hundred Twenty‑five Thousand Nine Hundred Dollars ($125,900.00). From and after January 1, 2023, through December 31, 2025: One Hundred Thirty‑four Thousand Four Hundred Dollars ($134,400.00). From and after January 1, 2026: ninety-five percent (95%) of the salary authorized by law for circuit and chancery court judges of this state. (7)  The annual salary of the full-time legal assistants shall be not less than Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) nor more than eighty percent (80%) of the salary of the district attorney for legal assistants who have been licensed to practice law for five (5) years or less; eighty-five percent (85%) of the salary of the district attorney for legal assistants who have been licensed to practice law for at least five (5) years but less than fifteen (15) years; and ninety percent (90%) of the salary of the district attorney for legal assistants who have been licensed to practice law for at least fifteen (15) years or more. (8)  A judge or district attorney who wishes to receive or continue to receive a retirement allowance while serving in elective office as authorized by Section 25-11-127(6) may waive all or any part of the compensation provided under this section in order to comply with the limitations on compensation required by Section 25-11-127(6). SECTION 11.  Section 25-3-36, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-3-36.  (1)  Until October 1, 2008, every justice court judge shall receive as full compensation for his or her services, and in lieu of any and all other fees, costs or compensation heretofore authorized for such justice court judge, an annual salary based upon the population of his or her county according to the latest federal decennial census; however, no justice court judge shall be paid less than the salary authorized under this section to be paid the justice court judge based upon the population of the county according to the 1980 federal decennial census.  The amount of which salary shall be determined as follows: (a)  In counties with a population of more than two hundred thousand (200,000), a salary of Fifty-five Thousand Five Hundred Fifty-nine Dollars ($55,559.00). (b)  In counties with a population of more than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) but not more than two hundred thousand (200,000), a salary of Fifty-one Thousand Five Dollars ($51,005.00). (c)  In counties with a population of more than seventy-five thousand (75,000) but not more than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000), a salary of Forty-six Thousand Four Hundred Fifty-one Dollars ($46,451.00). (d)  In counties with a population of more than forty-nine thousand (49,000) but not more than seventy-five thousand (75,000), a salary of Forty Thousand Seventy-five Dollars ($40,075.00). (e)  In counties with a population of more than thirty-four thousand (34,000) but not more than forty-nine thousand (49,000), a salary of Thirty-four Thousand Six Hundred Ten Dollars ($34,610.00). (f)  In counties with a population of more than twenty-four thousand five hundred (24,500) but not more than thirty-four thousand (34,000), a salary of Thirty-two Thousand Seven Hundred Eighty-nine Dollars ($32,789.00). (g)  In counties with a population of more than twenty-one thousand (21,000) but not more than twenty-four thousand five hundred (24,500), a salary of Twenty-nine Thousand One Hundred Forty-six Dollars ($29,146.00). (h)  In counties with a population of more than sixteen thousand five hundred (16,500) but not more than twenty-one thousand (21,000), a salary of Twenty-five Thousand Five Hundred Two Dollars ($25,502.00). (i)  In counties with a population of more than twelve thousand (12,000) but not more than sixteen thousand five hundred (16,500), a salary of Twenty-one Thousand Eight Hundred Fifty-nine Dollars ($21,859.00). (j)  In counties with a population of more than eight thousand (8,000) but not more than twelve thousand (12,000), a salary of Eighteen Thousand Dollars ($18,000.00). (k)  In counties with a population of eight thousand (8,000) or less, a salary of Fourteen Thousand Four Hundred Dollars ($14,400.00). The board of supervisors of any county having two (2) judicial districts and two (2) justice court judges for the county shall pay each justice court judge an amount equal to that provided in this subsection for judges in the next higher population category per year, if the justice court judge maintains regular office hours and is personally present in the office they maintain for at least thirty (30) hours per week. In any county having a population greater than eight thousand (8,000) but less than eight thousand five hundred (8,500) according to the 1990 federal decennial census and in which U.S. Highway 61 and Mississippi Highway 4 intersect, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay such justice court judges an additional amount not to exceed the sum of Eleven Thousand Five Hundred Fifty Dollars ($11,550.00) per year, payable beginning April 1, 1997. In any county having a population greater than ten thousand (10,000) but less than ten thousand five hundred (10,500) according to the 1990 federal decennial census and in which Mississippi Highway 3 and Mississippi Highway 6 intersect, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay such justice court judges an additional amount not to exceed One Thousand Four Hundred Fifty Dollars ($1,450.00) per year, payable beginning April 1, 1997. In any county having a population greater than twenty-four thousand seven hundred (24,700) and less than twenty-four thousand nine hundred (24,900), according to the 1990 federal census, wherein Mississippi Highways 15 and 16 intersect, the board of supervisors shall pay such justice court judge an additional amount equal to Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) per year. (2)  From and after October 1, 2008, every justice court judge shall receive as full compensation for his or her services, and in lieu of any and all other fees, costs or compensation heretofore authorized for such justice court judge, an annual salary in an amount that is the greater of the following: (a)  The amount paid to a member of the board of supervisors in the same county in which the justice court judge presides; or (b)  One hundred three percent (103%) of the salary authorized under this section as of September 30, 2008, for a justice court judge in that county. If supervisors of a county receive a salary increase, justice court judges whose salary is determined under this paragraph shall be paid an amount reflecting a commensurate increase. (3)  Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, in the event that the number of justice court judges authorized pursuant to Section 9-11-2(1) is exceeded pursuant to the provisions of Section 9-11-2(4), the aggregate of the salaries paid to the justice court judges of such a county shall not exceed the amount sufficient to pay the number of justice court judges authorized pursuant to Section 9-11-2(1), and such amount shall be equally divided among those justice court judges continuing to hold office under the provisions of Section 9-11-2(4). (4)  From and after January 1, 1984, all fees, costs, fines and penalties charged and collected in the justice court shall be paid to the clerk of the justice court for deposit, along with monies from cash bonds and other monies which have been forfeited in criminal cases, into the general fund of the county as provided in Section 9-11-19; and the clerk of the board of supervisors shall be authorized and empowered, upon approval by the board of supervisors, to make disbursements and withdrawals from the general fund of the county in order to pay any reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in complying with this section, including payment of the salaries of justice court judges as provided by subsection (1) of this section.  The provisions of this subsection shall not, except as to cash bonds and other monies which have been forfeited in criminal cases, apply to monies required to be deposited in the justice court clerk clearing account as provided in Section 9-11-18, Mississippi Code of 1972. (5)  The salaries provided for in this section shall be payable monthly by warrant drawn by the clerk of the board of supervisors on the general fund of the county; however, the board of supervisors, by resolution duly adopted and entered on its minutes, may provide that such salaries shall be paid semimonthly on the first and fifteenth day of each month or every two (2) weeks pursuant to Section 25-3-29.  If a pay date falls on a weekend or legal holiday, salary payments shall be made on the workday immediately preceding the weekend or legal holiday. (6)  Provided, that the salary of any justice court judge shall not be reduced during his term of office as a result of a population change following a federal decennial census. (7)  Any justice court judge who is unable to attend and hold court by reason of being under suspension by the Commission on Judicial Performance or the Mississippi Supreme Court shall not receive a salary while under such suspension. (8)  A justice court judge who wishes to receive or continue to receive a retirement allowance while serving in elective office as authorized by Section 25-11-127(6) may waive all or any part of the compensation provided under this section in order to comply with the limitations on compensation required by Section 25-11-127(6). SECTION 12.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.